Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 5. WORKERS' COMPENSATION

SUBTITLE B. DISCRIMINATION ISSUES

CHAPTER 451. DISCRIMINATION PROHIBITED

Sec. 451.001. DISCRIMINATION AGAINST EMPLOYEES PROHIBITED. A person may not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against an employee because the employee has:

(1) filed a workers' compensation claim in good faith;

(2) hired a lawyer to represent the employee in a claim;

(3) instituted or caused to be instituted in good faith a proceeding under Subtitle A; or

(4) testified or is about to testify in a proceeding under Subtitle A.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 451.002. REMEDIES; BURDEN OF PROOF. (a) A person who violates Section 451.001 is liable for reasonable damages incurred by the employee as a result of the violation.

(b) An employee discharged in violation of Section 451.001 is entitled to reinstatement in the former position of employment.

(c) The burden of proof in a proceeding under this section is on the employee.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 451.0025. WAIVER OF IMMUNITY; PERMISSION FOR FIRST RESPONDER TO SUE. (a) In this section, "first responder" has the meaning assigned by Section 421.095, Government Code.

(b) A first responder who alleges a violation of Section 451.001 by a state or local governmental entity that employs the first responder may sue the governmental entity for the relief provided by this chapter. Sovereign or governmental immunity from suit is waived and abolished to the extent of liability created by this chapter.

(c) To the extent a person has official or individual immunity from a claim for damages, this section does not affect that immunity.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 810 (H.B. 451), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 451.003. INJUNCTION. A district court may restrain, for cause shown, a violation of Section 451.001.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 269, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.